District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

2-906

Citizens Energy Advisory Committee.

Recodified as § 8-171.06.

History

Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-132, § 7, 28 DCR 445
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-24, § 11, 30 DCR 3341
May 19, 1987, D.C. Law 7-4, § 2, 34 DCR 2334
Oct. 9, 1987, D.C. Law 7-33, § 2, 34 DCR 5314
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 32, 35 DCR 147
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-45, § 2, 38 DCR 4988